Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5202
Legislative findings.

(1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(a) Current farm economic conditions in the State of Nebraska have resulted in unemployment, outmigration of people, loss of agricultural jobs, and difficulty in attracting and retaining farm operations; and

(b) Major revisions in Nebraska's tax structure are necessary to accomplish economic revitalization of rural Nebraska and to be competitive with other states involved in economic revitalization and development of agriculture.

(2) It is the policy of this state to make revisions in Nebraska's tax structure in order to encourage persons to seek careers in the farming industry, retain existing and established farm operations, promote the creation and retention of new farm jobs in Nebraska, and attract and retain investment capital in rural Nebraska.

Laws 1999, LB 630, § 3.